Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.370

Manner of giving verdict.

The jurors shall be asked by the court or the clerk whether they have agreed upon their verdict, and if the presiding juror answers in the affirmative, the presiding juror shall submit the verdict to the court.

[ 2003 c 406 s 20; Code 1881 s 237; 1877 p 49 s 241; 1869 p 58 s 241; RRS s 357.]